California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The bonds shall be sold at the times and in the amounts prescribed by the board of supervisors, but for not less than par.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22784.

Before selling all or any part of the bonds, the board of supervisors shall advertise for bids pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county, or if no such newspaper is published in the county, in some newspaper published in another county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

22785.

If satisfactory bids are received the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest bidder. If no bids are received or the board of supervisors determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board of supervisors may reject all bids received and either re-advertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22786.

The proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be deposited in the treasury of the principal county to the credit of the improvement fund of the district, and may be withdrawn for the purposes for which the bonds were voted as other district money is withdrawn.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cancellation of Unsold Bonds [22811. - 22814.]

22811.

If any bonds remain unsold for six months after having been offered for sale, the board of directors of the district for which the bonds were issued or of a district containing any territory which at the time of the bond election was embraced within the district for which the bonds were issued, may petition the board of supervisors to cause the unsold bonds to be withdrawn from the market and canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22812.

Upon receiving a petition signed by a majority of the members of the board of directors, the board of supervisors shall fix a time for hearing the petition. The hearing shall be held not more than 30 days after receipt of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22813.

The board of supervisors shall publish a notice stating the time and place of the hearing and the object of the petition in general terms, pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code in a newspaper published in the district or, if there is no such newspaper, in a newspaper published at the county seat of an affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

22814.

At the time and place designated in the notice, or at any subsequent time to which the hearing is postponed, the board of supervisors shall hear any reason that may be submitted for or against the granting of the petition. If the board of supervisors deems it for the best interest of the district named in the petition that the unsold bonds be canceled, it shall make and enter an order in its minutes that the unsold bonds are canceled. Thereafter the bonds and the vote by which they were authorized to be issued have no validity whatever.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Revenue Bonds [22850. - 22851.]

22850.

In addition to any other powers of the district to finance improvements and to provide an independent method of financing from that contained in any other sections of the California Airport District Act, subject to the provisions of this article a district may borrow money to provide funds to pay all costs of any public improvement authorized by this part and may issue revenue bonds to evidence the indebtedness created by such borrowing.

Such revenue bonds shall constitute special obligations and evidence a special indebtedness of the district which shall be a charge upon and payable as to the principal thereof, interest thereon, and any premiums upon the redemption of any thereof, solely from such revenues and funds as are specified therein and in the proceeding for their issuance. They shall not constitute general obligations of the district, and they shall neither constitute obligations nor evidence any indebtedness of any other public agency of which the district may be a part or of the State.

All such bonds shall recite upon their face the substance of the preceding portions of this section and shall also recite upon their face that they are issued under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 760.)
-------------------------------------------

22851.

Revenue bonds under this article shall be authorized, issued and sold under the provisions of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5, Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 760.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Taxation [22901. - 22909.]

22901.

As used in this chapter, “board of supervisors” means the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22902.

If the revenues of the district are inadequate to pay the interest or principal of the bonded indebtedness of the district as it becomes due, or to pay any other expenses of or claims against the district, the board of directors shall transmit to the board of supervisors and the county auditor a written estimate of the minimum amount of money required for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonded indebtedness as it becomes due, and of the minimum amount of money required by the district for any other purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22903.

The board shall transmit the estimates to the board of supervisors and the county auditor at least 15 days before the first day of the month in which the board of supervisors is required to levy taxes for county purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22904.

Annually, after receiving the estimates, the board of supervisors shall levy a tax sufficient for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonded indebtedness, designated as the “____ airport bond tax,” and a tax sufficient for the payment of all other expenses of, and claims against, the district, designated as the “____ airport district tax.”

The bond tax shall be levied annually until the bonded indebtedness is fully paid. The district tax shall be levied annually until all other expenses of and claims against the district are fully paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22905.

The bond tax shall be sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds for the year and the portion of the principal becoming due during the year. The bond tax shall also be sufficient to raise annually for the first half of the term of the bonds a sum sufficient to pay the interest for that period, and, during the balance of the term, sufficient to pay the annual interest and to pay annually a proportion of the principal equal to the amount produced by dividing the total amount of outstanding bonds by the number of years the bonds then have to run.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22906.

The proceeds of the bond tax shall be paid into the treasury of the principal county to the credit of the district interest and sinking fund and shall be used only for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds. The treasurer of the principal county shall pay the principal and interest on the bonds upon the warrant of the auditor of the principal county out of this fund. The county auditor shall cancel and retain the bonds and coupons when he draws his warrants on the treasurer in favor of the owners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22907.

The rate of the district tax levied in any one year shall not exceed twenty cents ($0.20) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of the real and personal property in the district, exclusive of the bond tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22908.

The bond and district taxes shall be levied on all the taxable property in the district. They shall be levied by the board of supervisors and collected by the tax collector of the principal county at the time and in the manner and form as county taxes are levied and collected. The proceeds of the taxes shall be paid to the district. The taxes become delinquent at the same time as county taxes and bear the same penalties for delinquency. The taxes are a lien on all taxable property in the district, have the same force and effect as liens for county taxes, and their collection shall be enforced by the same means as liens for county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22909.

A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. AIRCRAFT FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY ACT [24230. - 24410.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [24230. - 24247.]

24230.

This part may be cited as the Uniform Aircraft Financial Responsibility Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24231.

This part shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24232.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24233.

“Department” means the Department of Aeronautics in the Business and Transportation Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24234.

“Aircraft” means any contrivance now known, or hereafter invented, used or designed for navigation of or flight in the air.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24235.

“Judgment” means any judgment which has become final by expiration without appeal of the time within which an appeal might have been perfected, or by final affirmation on appeal, rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction of any state or of the United States, upon a claim for damages suffered by a claimant arising out of the ownership, operation, maintenance or use of any aircraft, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person or injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, or upon an agreement of settlement for such damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24236.

“Operator” means any person who is exercising actual physical control of an aircraft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24237.

“Owner” means any of the following persons who may be legally responsible for the operation of an aircraft:

(a) A person who holds the legal title to an aircraft.

(b) A lessee of an aircraft.

(c) A conditional vendee, a trustee under a trust receipt and a mortgager or other person holding an aircraft subject to a security interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24238.

“Passenger” means any person in, on or boarding an aircraft for the purpose of riding therein, or alighting therefrom following a flight or attempted flight therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24239.

“Person” means any individual, firm, copartnership, association or corporation, public or private, including his or its successors, assignees or legal representatives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24240.

“Notification” means notice in writing served upon a person by either:

(a) Actual delivery or offer of delivery to such person by any adult individual whose rights are not affected by the proceeding involved; or

(b) Registered mail addressed to the person at the last address known to the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24241.

“State” means any state, the District of Columbia, any territory or possession of the United States and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24242.

“Claimants” means any person having a claim for damages as the result of an accident within this state involving an aircraft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24243.

This part does not apply to:

(a) Any aircraft owned and operated by or leased to and subject to the sole control of the United States or any civil or military agency of the United States or of the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico or any territory or possession of the United States.

(b) Any aircraft owned and operated by or leased to and subject to the sole control of this or any other state or agency thereof or any political subdivision or municipality of this or any other state.

(c) Any aircraft owned and operated by or leased to and subject to the sole control of any foreign country or any civil or military agency thereof or any political subdivision or municipality thereof.

(d) Any commercial air operator subject to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 2.

(e) Any aircraft operated by an operator subject to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 11931) of Chapter 5 of Division 6 of the Agricultural Code.

(f) Any person who maintains in effect an insurance policy meeting the requirements of Section 24350 and who has filed with the department a certificate of insurance issued by the insurance company which issued such policy; provided, however, that such person shall, in accordance with the provisions of Section 24300, report each aircraft accident in which he is involved as operator or owner of aircraft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

24244.

This part shall not apply with respect to any accident occurring prior to the effective date of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24245.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as precluding any party in any action or proceeding from employing other processes provided by law. Nothing in this part shall be construed as precluding the utilization by the department of the injunctive or other process of the courts in aid of the enforcement of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24246.

A discharge in bankruptcy shall not relieve any person from the requirements of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24247.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as authorizing the state to license the operators of aircraft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administration [24250. - 24254.]

24250.

The department shall administer and enforce the provisions of this part and may make rules and regulations necessary for its administration.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as requiring any license for operators of aircraft other than that required by the federal government, or to permit any registration of aircraft by the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24251.

The department shall provide for hearings upon request of any person who may be affected by its orders or acts under the provisions of this part and may provide for a stay thereof until a hearing may be had. All hearings held under this part shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, and the department shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24252.

Any person aggrieved by any rule, regulation, order or act of the department or by a failure of the department to act hereunder, may have judicial review thereof as provided in Sections 11440 and 11523 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24253.

The records of and proceedings before the department shall be inadmissible in evidence and shall not be referred to at the trial of any civil action or criminal proceeding.

Subject to the foregoing provisions, the department shall, upon written request, make available to persons whose legal rights may be affected thereby, information and material developed in the course of its administration of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24254.

(a) The operation of an aircraft on the land or waters of, or in the air over, this state shall be deemed an appointment by the owner or operator of the department to be his true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all legal process in any action or proceeding against him, arising from the ownership, maintenance, use or operation of such aircraft and resulting in damage or loss to person or property, and said use or operation shall be signification of their agreement that any such process against him which is so served, shall be of the same legal force and validity as though served upon him personally; provided, such person is a nonresident of this state or at the time a cause of action arises is a resident of this state but subsequently becomes a nonresident of this state.

(b) Service of such process shall be made by leaving a copy of the summons and complaint with the department or in its office at Sacramento, together with a fee of two dollars ($2), and by the mailing of a copy of such summons and complaint by the plaintiff or his attorney to the defendant, and to each of the defendants if more than one at his last known address, within 10 days thereafter by registered mail. In lieu of such mailing to such defendant in a foreign state, plaintiff may cause a copy of the summons and complaint to be served personally in the foreign state upon such defendant by any adult person not a party to the suit, by actually delivering the same to such defendant or by offering to make such delivery in case defendant refuses to accept delivery.

(c) Proof of the service of such process upon the department, and proof of the mailing or personal delivery thereof to the defendant, shall be made by the affidavit or affidavits of the party or parties doing the acts, which shall be filed with the court from out of which such summons issued, within such time as the court may allow for the return of such summons. Process shall be deemed to be completed upon the filing of such affidavit or affidavits and of the original registry receipt issued by the post office upon the mailing of such registered letter, if service is obtained by mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Security Following Accident [24300. - 24362.]



  ARTICLE 1. Accident Report [24300. - 24302.]

24300.

The operator of any aircraft involved in an accident within this state in which any person is killed or injured or damage in excess of four hundred dollars ($400), is sustained to the property of any person, other than property owned by the owner or operator, or in his care, custody or control, or carried in or on the aircraft, shall immediately but not later than 15 days after the accident report the matter in writing to the department. If the operator is physically incapable of making the report, the owner of the aircraft involved in the accident, shall immediately but not later than 15 days after learning of the accident, make the report. If neither the operator nor the owner is physically capable of making the report, then each passenger shall, within 15 days after learning of the incapacity of the operator or owner, make the report. If the owner or operator dies as a result of the accident, the legal representative of the operator or owner shall make the report within 15 days after his qualifications. The sheriff of the county in which the accident occurred, or the chief of police of the city in which the accident occurred, as the case may be, shall notify the department in writing immediately but not later than 15 days after learning of the accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

24301.

The report, the form of which shall be prescribed by the department, shall include information to enable the department to determine whether the requirements for the deposit of security under Article 2 (commencing with Section 24325) are inapplicable by reason of existence of insurance or other exceptions specified in this part. The department may rely upon the accuracy of the information until it has reason to believe that the information is erroneous.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24302.

The operator and the owner shall furnish such additional information as the department may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Security [24325. - 24327.]

24325.

As promptly as practicable but not later than 30 days after receipt of an accident report as required in Article 1 (commencing with Section 24300), the department shall determine by an order entered of record (a) the amount of security within the limits specified in Section 24350, which it deems sufficient to satisfy any judgment for damages resulting from the accident which may be recovered against each owner or operator, and (b) the name and address of each claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24326.

As promptly as practicable but not later than 30 days after the entry of the order required by Section 24325, the department, the owner or the operator, or both, as the case may be, shall deposit for the benefit of the owner or operator or both, as the case may be, security in the sum so determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24327.

The requirements as to security do not apply:

(a) To the operator of an aircraft involved in an accident in which no injury was caused to the person of anyone other than the operator or guests, and no damage in excess of four hundred dollars ($400) was caused to property not owned, rented, occupied or used by such operator nor in his care, custody or control nor carried in or on the aircraft.

(b) To the operator or owner of an aircraft if at the time of the accident the aircraft was stationary, without passengers thereon or boarding the aircraft or alighting therefrom and the aircraft was parked in an area legally used for aircraft parking with no engine running nor in the process of being started.

(c) To the owner of an aircraft if at the time of the accident the aircraft was being operated, or was parked, without his permission, express or implied.

(d) To the owner if there is in effect at the time of the accident an aircraft liability policy or bond with respect to the aircraft involved in the accident. 

(e) To the operator, if not the owner of the aircraft, if there is in effect at the time of the accident an aircraft liability policy or bond with respect to his operation of the aircraft involved in the accident.

(f) To the operator or owner if his liability for damages resulting from such accident is covered by any other form of liability insurance policy or bond in effect at the time of the accident.

(g) To any person qualifying as a self-insurer under Section 24353, or to any person operating an aircraft for the self-insurer for whose acts the self-insurer is legally responsible.

(h) After there is filed with the department satisfactory evidence that the person otherwise required to deposit security has (1) been released from liability, or (2) been adjudicated not to be liable by judgment, or (3) executed a written agreement with all claimants providing for payment of an agreed amount with respect to all claims for injuries or damages resulting from the accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Financial Responsibility [24350. - 24362.]

24350.

A policy or bond is not effective under Article 2 unless:

(a) Issued either (1) by an insurer or surety company authorized to do business in this state, or (2) by an insurer or surety company not authorized to do business in this state but which is found by the department to afford adequate protection and which has filed or shall file with the department a power of attorney authorizing the department to accept service on his behalf of notice or process in any action upon the policy or bond arising out of such accident.

(b) If the accident results in bodily injury to or death of a person not a passenger, the policy or bond provides coverage of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any accident and one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident.

(c) If the accident results in damage to or destruction of property, the policy or bond provides coverage of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) because of damage to or destruction of property in any one accident with the exception of the following property which is exempted from the security required under this part: property owned, rented, occupied or used by, or in the care, custody or control of the owner or operator or carried in or on the aircraft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24351.

The policy or bond need not cover:

(a) Any liability on account of bodily injury to or death of any employee of the owner or operator while the employee is engaged in the duties of the person’s employment.

(b) Any obligation for which the owner or operator or the insurer of the owner or operator may be held liable under any workers’ compensation law.

(c) A guest, or any other person, riding in or upon any aircraft without giving compensation.

(d) (1) Any liability for bodily injury or death of any occupant riding in or upon an aircraft or exiting an aircraft for purposes of skydiving or sport parachuting when that occupant’s injury or death is solely related to hazardous risks associated with skydiving or sport parachuting activities.

(2) Any person described in paragraph (1) who is not afforded the protection of liability insurance in connection with skydiving or sport parachuting activities shall be provided a notice in at least 14-point type that discloses the fact that no liability insurance is in effect that provides coverage for the skydiving or sport parachuting activities that are being undertaken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 333, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24352.

Any person may at any time apply to the department for a certificate of self-insurance, whether or not there has occurred an accident as a result of which he might be affected by some other provision of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24353.

The department may in its discretion issue a certificate of self-insurance when satisfied that the applicant is possessed and will continue to be possessed of ability to pay judgments against him within the limits provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24354.

Upon not less than 10 days notification of a self-insurer the department may for reasonable cause cancel a certificate of self-insurance and shall cancel such certificate upon failure to pay any judgment within 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24355.

The security required under this part shall be cash or securities permissible under state law as security for deposit of state funds and in such amount as the department may require but in no case in excess of the limits specified in Section 24350 in reference to the limits of a policy or bond. If at the time of the accident there is in effect a liability policy or a bond meeting the requisites of this part other than in the amount of coverage set forth in Section 24350, the department may consider such policy or bond in fixing the amount of security. The person depositing security shall specify in writing the person or persons on whose behalf the deposit is made and, at any time while such deposit is in the custody of the state agency with which the deposit is made the person depositing it may, upon approval of the department, amend in writing the specification of the person or persons on whose behalf the deposit is made to include an additional person or persons; provided, however, that a single deposit of security shall be applicable only on behalf of persons required to furnish security because of the same accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24356.

Upon 10 days notification of the parties concerned, the department may reduce, or, within the limits specified in Section 24350, increase the amount of security ordered in any case if in its discretion the amount ordered is excessive or insufficient. In case the security originally ordered has been deposited, the excess shall be returned to the depositor notwithstanding the provisions of Section 24357. Substitution of security shall be permitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.

Security deposited in compliance with the requirements of this part shall be delivered to the department. The department shall deposit all cash received as security in a special account in the Special Deposit Fund provided by Article 2 (commencing with Section 16370) of Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code, shall record the receipt of all securities received by it and deposit such securities with the State Treasurer, and shall retain in its custody all original insurance policies or copies thereof delivered to it. Security deposited with any agency other than the department shall be released only:

(a) Upon certificate of the department in the payment of a judgment rendered against the person or persons on whose behalf the deposit was made, for damages arising out of the accident in a civil action, begun not later than one year after the date of the accident or within one year after the date of deposit of any security under subdivision (c) of Section 24330 or in the payment of a settlement, agreed to by the depositor and all the claimants, of a claim or claims arising out of the accident.

(b) Upon certificate of the department issued after 10 days notification of all claimants upon evidence satisfactory to the department that all claims arising from such accident have been satisfied by either (1) a release from liability, or (2) a judgment of nonliability, or (3) a written agreement in accordance with subdivision (h) of Section 24327, or whenever, after the expiration of one year from the time of the accident or from the date of deposit of any security under subdivision (c) of Section 24330 the department is given evidence satisfactory that there is no such action pending and that no judgment rendered in any such action is unpaid.

(c) Upon the certificate of the department that other security complying with Section 24355 and satisfactory in form, character and amount, has been deposited with it in lieu of the original security deposited hereunder.

(d) Upon the death of the person on whose behalf such proof was filed.

(e) In the event of the permanent incapacity of such person to operate an aircraft if the department is furnished proof of such incapacity.

The department shall not release such proof: (1) if any action for damages upon a liability referred to in this part is then pending, or (2) if any judgment upon any such liability is outstanding and unsatisfied.

An affidavit of the applicant of the nonexistence of such facts shall be prima facie evidence thereof.

Any security deposited with the department shall be released by it for any reason authorizing it to issue a certificate pursuant to subdivision (a), (b) or (c) when security is in the custody of another state agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24358.

Such security shall be available for the following purposes:

(a) Payment of a final judgment or judgments in any amount for bodily injury or in excess of four hundred dollars ($400) for property damage, rendered against the owner or operator on whose behalf the deposit was made, for damages arising out of the accident in an action at law, begun not later than one year after the date of such accident.

(b) Payment of any settlement agreement covering any claim arising out of the accident.

(c) Payment of any final judgment rendered as a result of default under any duly acknowledged settlement agreement.

Every distribution of funds from the security deposit shall be subject to the limits of the department’s evaluation on behalf of a claimant but not in excess of the maximum amounts provided in this part for bodily injury and for property damage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24359.

Every judgment shall for the purposes of this part be deemed satisfied:

(a) When fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) has been credited, upon any judgment in excess of that amount, or upon all judgments, collectively, which together total in excess of that amount, for personal injury to or death of one person as a result of any one accident.

(b) When, subject to the limit of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) as to one person, the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) has been credited upon any judgment in excess of that amount, or upon all judgments, collectively, which together total in excess of that amount, for personal injury to or death of more than one person as a result of any one accident.

(c) When fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) has been credited upon any judgment in excess of that amount, or upon all judgments, collectively, each of which is in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), and which together total in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), for damage to property of others as a result of any one accident.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24360.

Whenever any evidence of proof of ability to respond in damages filed by any person under the provisions of this part no longer fulfills the purpose for which required the department shall, for the purpose of this part, require other evidence of ability to respond in damages as required by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24361.

No insurance policy meeting the requirements of Section 24350 shall be canceled unless 30 days’ prior notice is given to the department by either the insured or the insurance company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

24362.

Every person permitting another person to operate an aircraft under the terms of any rental agreement or lease which provides for any remuneration for the use of such aircraft shall deliver either of the following to the person renting the aircraft:

(a) A written certification that an aircraft liability policy of insurance exists for the operator thereof, specifying the name of the insurance company providing such coverage, the policy number, the expiration date of such policy, the nature and extent of coverage, and a statement that such coverage complies with the financial responsibility laws of California applicable to the operation of an aircraft. Such certification shall be furnished and signed, by facsimile or otherwise, by a California licensed insurance agent, broker, or insurance carrier. The person delivering the written authorization provided for herein shall certify as to the accuracy thereof as of the date of delivery.

(b) A written statement that no insurance coverage exists for the operator of the aircraft. Such statement shall be delivered to the person renting the aircraft prior to entering into any binding rental agreement and shall substantially conform to the following text:
 
“NOTICE TO AIRCRAFT OPERATOR
“You are hereby notified that no insurance coverage is being provided to cover your liability for bodily injury and property damage you may cause as an operator of any aircraft covered by our rental agreement.

“You are further notified that the Uniform Aircraft Financial Responsibility Act (Part 5 (commencing with Section 24230) of Division 9 of the Public Utilities Code) requires that you be able to post security in an amount up to $50,000 because of bodily injury or death to one person in any one accident, up to $100,000 because of bodily injury or death to two or more persons in any one accident, and up to $50,000 in the event of damage to or destruction of property.

“Failure to furnish sufficient security or failure to furnish evidence of proof of ability to respond in damages as required under Section 24325 and Section 24360 of the Public Utilities Code is a misdemeanor.”

(c) No insurance agent, broker, or insurance carrier shall have any liability as a result of the failure to deliver the certificate specified in paragraph (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Penalties [24400. - 24403.]

24400.

Any owner or operator who knowingly refuses or fails to make any report of an accident as required in Article 1 (commencing with Section 24300) of Chapter 3 of this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24401.

Any owner or operator who knowingly makes a false statement or representation of a material fact in a report to or written instrument filed with the department shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned for not more than 90 days, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)